Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.200

State treasurer's service fund—Expenditure limitation.

All moneys deposited in the state treasurer's service fund shall be expended only pursuant to legislative appropriation and for the purposes set forth in RCW 43.08.190, 43.08.200, and * 43.85.241.

[ 1973 c 27 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.85.241 was repealed by 1985 c 57 s 90, effective July 1, 1985.